Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.360

Assistance for parolees, work release, and discharged prisoners—Community services revolving fund.

The department of corrections shall create, maintain, and administer outside the state treasury a permanent revolving fund to be known as the "community services revolving fund" into which shall be deposited all moneys received by it under RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370 and any appropriation made for the purposes of RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370. All expenditures from this revolving fund shall be made by check or voucher signed by the secretary of corrections or his or her designee. The community services revolving fund shall be deposited by the department of corrections in such banks or financial institutions as it may select which shall give to the department a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, or collateral eligible as security for deposit of state funds in at least the full amount of deposit.

This section applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 351; 1986 c 125 s 5; 1981 c 136 s 49; 1971 ex.s. c 31 s 6; 1961 c 217 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.